Hawaii statutes.
§328-76 Penalty. Any person who
violates any of the provisions of sections 328-71 to 328-75 or the orders,
rules or regulations of the department of health under authority thereof, shall
be fined not more than $500, or imprisoned not more than one hundred days, or
both. [L 1945, c 101, §6; RL 1955, §51-60; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS
§328-76]

Cross References

Classification of offense and authorized punishment, see
§§701-107, 706-640, 663.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next